pt-BR: Use a classificação de proteção contra ingresso (IP) quando houver um código IP oficial disponível.: Fluxo de água pelo cabo; Alimentação de água por mangueira; Dispenser de sabão integrado; Sem alimentação de água; Outro
en: Water-fed design: Flow-through handle; Hose-connect water-fed; Integrated soap dispenser; Not water-fed; Other
bg-BG: Дизайн с подаване на вода: Дръжка с пропускане на вода; Свързване с маркуч за подаване на вода; Вграден дозатор за сапун; Без подаване на вода; Друго
ru: Конструкция с подачей воды: Рукоятка с подачей воды; С подключением к шлангу; Встроенный дозатор мыла; Без подачи воды; Другое
vi: Thiết kế cấp nước: Dòng chảy qua tay cầm; Cấp nước nối ống; Hộp xà phòng tích hợp; Không cấp nước; Khác
fi: Vedensyötön menetelmä: Läpivirtauskahva; Vesisyöttö letkuliitännällä; Integroitu saippua-annostelija; Ei vesisyöttöä; Muu
de: Bauweise mit Wasserdurchlauf: Wasserdurchlauf-Griff; Wasserführend mit Schlauchanschluss; Integrierter Seifenspender; Nicht wasserführend; Sonstiges
pl: Konstrukcja z zasilaniem wodą: Rączka z przepływem wody; Zasilane z węża; Zintegrowany dozownik mydła; Niezasilane wodą; Inne
el: Σχεδιασμός με τροφοδοσία νερού: Λαβή συνεχούς ροής; Παροχή νερού με σύνδεση σε λάστιχο; Ενσωματωμένος διανομέας σαπουνιού; Χωρίς παροχή νερού; Άλλο
ko: 물 공급식 설계: 유수형 핸들; 호스 연결 급수형; 일체형 비누 디스펜서; 급수형 아님; 기타
da: Vandførende design: Gennemstrømningshåndtag; Vandtilførsel med slangetilslutning; Integreret sæbedispenser; Ingen vandtilførsel; Andet
es: Diseño con suministro de agua: Mango con flujo de agua; Conexión para manguera de agua; Dispensador de jabón integrado; Sin alimentación de agua; Otro
pt-PT: Design com alimentação de água: Pega com passagem de água; Alimentação de água por ligação de mangueira; Dispensador de sabão integrado; Sem alimentação de água; Outro
hu: Vízzel való használat: Átfolyós nyél; Tömlőre csatlakoztatható vizes; Beépített szappanadagoló; Nem vizes; Egyéb
ja: 給水式設計: ハンドル通水型; ホース接続通水型; 石鹸ディスペンサー一体型; 通水不可; その他
zh-CN: 供水设计: 流通手柄; 软管连接通水; 集成皂液器; 非通水; 其他
fr: Type d’alimentation en eau: Poignée à passage d’eau; Alimentation en eau par tuyau; Distributeur de savon intégré; Sans alimentation en eau; Autre
hr-HR: Dizajn s napajanjem vodom: Ručka za protok; Dovod vode spajanjem na crijevo; Ugrađeni dozator za sapun; Bez dovoda vode; Ostalo
sk-SK: Dizajn s napájaním vodou: Rukoväť s prietokom; Napájanie vodou cez hadicu; Integrovaný dávkovač mydla; Bez napájania vodou; Iné
tr: Suyla beslemeli tasarım: Sap içinden akışlı; Hortum bağlantılı su beslemeli; Entegre sabunluk; Su beslemeli değil; Diğer
lt-LT: Vandens tiekimo dizainas: Vanduo teka per rankeną; Prijungiamas prie žarnos; Integruotas muilo dozatorius; Be vandens tiekimo; Kita
nl: Waterdoorvoer ontwerp: Steel met waterdoorvoer; Watertoevoer via tuinslang; Geïntegreerde zeepdispenser; Zonder watertoevoer; Overige
cs: Provedení s přívodem vody: Průtoková rukojeť; Připojení na hadici; Integrovaný dávkovač mýdla; Bez přívodu vody; Jiné
it: Design con alimentazione ad acqua: Impugnatura a flusso continuo; Connessione tubo flessibile per alimentazione idrica; Dispenser di sapone integrato; Non alimentato ad acqua; Altro
th: การออกแบบที่จ่ายน้ำ: น้ำไหลผ่านด้ามจับ; จ่ายน้ำผ่านสายยาง; ช่องจ่ายสบู่ในตัว; ไม่มีระบบจ่ายน้ำ; อื่นๆ
nb: Vannforsynt utforming: Gjennomstrømningshåndtak; Slangetilkoblet vanntilførsel; Integrert såpedispenser; Uten vanntilførsel; Annet
ro-RO: Design cu alimentare cu apă: Mâner cu flux de apă; Alimentat cu apă prin furtun; Dozator de săpun integrat; Nealimentat cu apă; Altele
zh-TW: 通水設計: 水流穿透式握把; 連接水管式通水; 內建給皂器; 非通水式; 其他
sv: Typ av vattenapplicering: Genomströmningshandtag; Vattenmatad slanganslutning; Integrerad tvåldispenser; Ej vattenmatad; Övrigt
sl-SI: Zasnova s pretokom vode: Ročaj za pretok vode; Priklop na cev za vodo; Vgrajen dozirnik mila; Brez dovoda vode; Drugo